Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 272A Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act
272A.8-200.
Right of director or committee member to information.

A director or a member of a committee appointed under KRS

272A.8-170

may obtain, inspect, and copy all information regarding the state of activities and financial condition of the limited cooperative association and other information regarding the activities of the association if the information is reasonably related to the performance of the director’s duties as director or the committee member’s duties as a member of the committee. Information obtained in accordance with this section may not be used in any manner that would violate any duty of or to the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 73, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-210.
Appointment and authority of officers.

A limited cooperative association has the officers:

Provided in the organic rules; or

Established by the board of directors in a manner not inconsistent with the organic rules.

The organic rules may designate or, if the rules do not designate, the board of directors shall designate, one (1) of the association’s officers for preparing all records required by KRS

272A.1-120

and for the authentication of records.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall appoint the officers of the limited cooperative association.

Officers of a limited cooperative association shall perform the duties the organic rules prescribe or as authorized by the board of directors not in a manner inconsistent with the organic rules.

The election or appointment of an officer of a limited cooperative association does not of itself create a contract between the association and the officer.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a limited cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 74, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-220.
Resignation and removal of officers.

The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

An officer of a limited cooperative association may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the association. Unless the notice specifies a later time, the resignation is effective when the notice is given.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 75, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 9. Indemnification

272A.9-010.
Indemnification and advancement.

The organic rules may provide indemnification to a director for judgments, settlements, penalties, fines, or expenses incurred in a proceeding to which a director is a party because the person is a director.

No indemnification may be provided for conduct violating the standards in effect pursuant to KRS

272A.8-180

.

The organic rules may provide that the limited cooperative association may advance expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, incurred by a director in connection with a claim or demand against the director by reason of the director’s relationship to an association before the final disposition of the claim or demand, upon an undertaking by or on behalf of the director to repay the association if the director is ultimately determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under subsection (2) of this section. The terms of the undertaking shall be as set forth in the organic rules or as approved by the disinterested director and shall be in a record.

The organic rules may provide for the indemnification of and advancement to other persons including committee members who are not directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 76, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 10. Contributions, Allocations, and Distributions

272A.10-010.
Member contributions.

The organic rules shall establish the amount, manner, or method of determining any contribution requirements for members or shall authorize the board of directors to establish the amount, manner, or other method of determining any contribution requirements for members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 77, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-020.
Contribution and valuation.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the contributions of a member to a limited cooperative association may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the association, including money, labor, or other services performed or to be performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute money or property, and contracts to be performed.

The receipt and acceptance of contributions and the valuation of contributions shall be reflected in a limited cooperative association’s records.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall determine the value of a member’s contributions received or to be received, and the determination by the board of directors of valuation is conclusive for purposes of determining whether the member’s contribution obligation has been met.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 78, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-030.
Contribution agreements.

Except as otherwise provided in the agreement, the following rules apply to an agreement made by a person before formation of a limited cooperative association to make a contribution to the association:

The agreement is irrevocable for six (6) months after the agreement is signed by the person unless all parties to the agreement consent to the revocation; and

If a person does not make a required contribution:

The person is obligated, at the option of the association, once formed, to contribute money equal to the value of that part of the contribution that has not been made, and the obligation may be enforced as a debt to the association; or

The association, once formed, may rescind the agreement if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty (20) days after the association demands payment from the person, and upon rescission the person has no further rights or obligations with respect to the association.

With respect to any agreement to make a contribution to a limited cooperative association made at the time of or subsequent to its formation, unless the organic rules or an agreement to make a contribution to a limited cooperative association otherwise provide, if a person does not make a required contribution to an association, the person or the person’s estate is obligated, at the option of the association, to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution which has not been made.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 79, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-040.
Allocation of profits and losses.

The organic rules may provide for allocating profits of a limited cooperative association among members, among persons that are not members but conduct business with the association, to an unallocated account, or to any combination thereof. Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, losses of the association shall be allocated in the same proportion as profits.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, all profits and losses of a limited cooperative association shall be allocated to patron members.

If a limited cooperative association has investor members, the organic rules may not allocate to patron members less than fifty percent (50%) of profits. For purposes of this subsection, the following rules apply:

Amounts paid or due on contracts for the delivery to the association by patron members of products, goods, or services are not considered amounts allocated to patron members; and

Amounts paid, due, or allocated to investor members as a stated fixed return on equity are not considered amounts allocated to investor members.

Unless prohibited by the organic rules, in determining the profits for allocation under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the board of directors may first deduct and set aside a part of the profits to create or accumulate:

An unallocated capital reserve; and

Reasonable unallocated reserves for specific purposes, including:

Expansion and replacement of capital assets;

Education, training, and cooperative development;

Creation and distribution of information concerning principles of cooperation; and

Community responsibility.

Subject to subsections (2) and (6) of this section and the organic rules, the board of directors shall allocate the amount remaining after any deduction or setting aside of profits for unallocated reserves under subsection (4) of this section:

To patron members in the ratio of each member’s patronage to the total patronage of all patron members during the period for which allocations are to be made; and

To investor members, if any, in the ratio of each investor member’s contributions to the total contributions of all investor members.

For purposes of allocation of profits and losses or specific items of profits or losses of a limited cooperative association to members, the organic rules may establish allocation units or methods based on separate classes of members or, for patron members, on class, function, division, district, department, allocation units, pooling arrangements, members’ contributions, or other equitable methods.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 80, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-050.
Distributions.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide and subject to KRS

272A.10-070

, the board of directors may authorize, and the limited cooperative association may make, distributions to members.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, distributions to members may be made in any form, including money, capital credits, allocated patronage equities, revolving fund certificates, and the limited cooperative association’s own or other securities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 81, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-060.
Redemption or repurchase of distributed property.

Property distributed to a member by a limited cooperative association, other than money, may be redeemed or repurchased as provided in the organic rules, but a redemption or repurchase may not be made without authorization by the board of directors. The board may withhold authorization for any reason in its sole discretion. A redemption or repurchase is treated as a distribution for purposes of KRS

272A.10-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 82, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-070.
Limitations on distributions.

A limited cooperative association may not make a distribution if, after the distribution:

The association would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the association’s activities;

The association’s assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities; or

The distribution violates the organic rules.

A limited cooperative association may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (1) of this section on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the effect of a distribution allowed under subsection (2) of this section is measured:

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of financial rights in the limited cooperative association, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt is incurred by the association; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after that date; or

The payment is made, if payment occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the distribution is authorized.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

For purposes of this section, “distribution” does not include reasonable amounts paid to a member in the ordinary course of business as payment or compensation for commodities, goods, past or present services, or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement or other benefits program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 83, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.10-080.
Liability for improper distributions.

A director who consents to a distribution that violates KRS

272A.10-070

is personally liable to the limited cooperative association for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation if it is established that in consenting to the distribution the director failed to comply with KRS

272A.8-180

.

A member or transferee of financial rights which received a distribution knowing that the distribution was made in violation of KRS

272A.10-070

is personally liable to the limited cooperative association to the extent the distribution exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid.

A director against whom an action is commenced under subsection (1) of this section may:

Implement in the action any other director who is liable under subsection (1) of this section and compel contribution from the person; and

Implement in the action any person that is liable under subsection (2) of this section and compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received as described in subsection (2) of this section.

An action under this section is barred if it is commenced later than two (2) years after the distribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 84, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 11. Member Dissociation

272A.11-010.
Member’s dissociation.

A person has the power to dissociate as a member at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member’s dissociation from a limited cooperative association is wrongful only if the dissociation:

Breaches an express provision of the organic rules; or

Occurs before the termination of the limited cooperative association and:

The person is expelled as a member under subsection (4)(c) or (d) of this section; or

In the case of a person that is not an individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated as a member because it dissolved or terminated in bad faith.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a person that wrongfully dissociates as a member is liable to the limited cooperative association for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other debt, obligation, or liability of the person to the association.

A member is dissociated from the limited cooperative association as a member when:

The association receives notice in a record of the member’s express will to dissociate as a member, or if the member specifies in the notice an effective date later than the date the association received notice, on that later date;

An event stated in the organic rules as causing the member’s dissociation as a member occurs;

The member is expelled as a member under the organic rules;

The member is expelled as a member by the board of directors because:

It is unlawful to carry on the association’s activities with the member as a member;

There has been a transfer of all the member’s financial rights in the association, other than:

A creation or perfection of a security interest; or

A charging order in effect under KRS

272A.6-050

which has not been foreclosed;

The member is a limited liability company, association, or partnership, which has been dissolved, and its business is being wound up;

The member is a corporation or cooperative and:

The member filed articles of dissolution or the equivalent, or the jurisdiction of formation revoked its charter or right to conduct business;

The association sends a notice to the member that it will be expelled as a member for a reason described in subdivision a. of this subparagraph; and

Not later than ninety (90) days after the notice was sent under subdivision b. of this subparagraph, the member did not revoke its articles of dissolution or the equivalent, or the jurisdiction of formation did not reinstate the corporation’s or cooperative’s charter or right to conduct business; or

The member is an individual and is adjudged incompetent;

In the case of a member who is an individual, the individual dies;

In the case of a member that is a trust or is acting as a member by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, all the trust’s financial rights in the association are distributed;

In the case of a member that is an estate, the estate’s entire financial interest in the association is distributed;

In the case of a member that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, corporation, trust, or estate, the member is terminated; or

The association’s participation in a merger if, under the plan of merger, the member ceases to be a member.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 85, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.11-020.
Effect of member’s dissociation.

Upon a member’s dissociation:

Subject to KRS

272A.11-030

, the person has no further rights as a member; and

Subject to KRS

272A.11-030

and Subchapter 16 of this chapter, any financial rights owned by the person in the person’s capacity as a member immediately before dissociation are owned by the person as a transferee.

A person’s dissociation as a member does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or liability to the limited cooperative association which the person incurred under the organic rules, by contract, or by other means while a member.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 86, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.11-030.
Power of estate of member.

Unless the organic rules provide for greater rights, if a member is dissociated because of death or is expelled by reason of being adjudged incompetent, the member’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee of the member’s financial rights and, for purposes of settling the estate of a deceased member, may exercise the informational rights of a current member to obtain information under KRS

272A.5-040

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 87, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 12. Dissolution of a Limited Cooperative Association

272A.12-010.
Dissolution and winding up.

A limited cooperative association is dissolved only as provided in this subchapter and upon dissolution winds up in accordance with.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 88, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-020.
Nonjudicial dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

272A.12-030

and

272A.12-040

, a limited cooperative association is dissolved and its activities shall be wound up:

Upon the occurrence of an event or at a time specified in the articles of association;

Upon the action of the association’s organizers, board of directors, or members under KRS

272A.12-040

and

272A.12-050

; or

Ninety (90) days after the dissociation of a member, which results in the association having one (1) patron member and no other members, unless the association:

Has a sole member that is a cooperative; or

Not later than the end of the ninety (90) day period, admits at least one (1) member in accordance with the organic rules and has at least two (2) members, at least one (1) of which is a patron member.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 89, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-030.
Judicial dissolution.

The appropriate court may dissolve a limited cooperative association or order any action that under the circumstances is appropriate and equitable:

In a proceeding initiated by the Attorney General, if:

The association obtained its articles of association through fraud; or

The association has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law; or

In a proceeding initiated by a member if:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the association’s affairs, the members are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the association is occurring or is threatened because of the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the association have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired for two (2) consecutive periods during which annual members meetings were held or were to be held; or

The assets of the association are being misapplied or wasted.

The clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree of dissolution to the Secretary of State, who shall file it. The dissolution shall be effective upon the latter of the date specified by the court or the filing of the decree of dissolution by the Secretary of State.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the appropriate court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the business and affairs of the limited cooperative association and the notification of claimants in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 90, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-040.
Voluntary dissolution before commencement of activity.

A majority of the organizers or initial directors of a limited cooperative association that has not yet begun business activity or the conduct of its affairs may dissolve the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 91, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-050.
Voluntary dissolution by board of directors and members.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

272A.12-040

, for a limited cooperative association to voluntarily dissolve:

A resolution to dissolve shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors unless a greater percentage is required by the organic rules;

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider the resolution, to be held not later than ninety (90) days after adoption of the resolution; and

The board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver to each member in a record that complies with KRS

272A.5-070

:

The resolution required by paragraph (a) of this subsection;

A recommendation that the members vote in favor of the resolution or, if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis of that determination; and

Notice of the members meeting, which shall be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a resolution to dissolve shall be approved by:

At least two-thirds (2/3) of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage.

The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under subsection (2)(b) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting; or

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 92, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-060.
Winding up.

A limited cooperative association continues after dissolution only for purposes of winding up its activities.

In winding up a limited cooperative association’s activities, the board of directors shall cause the association to:

Discharge its liabilities, settle and close its activities, and marshal and distribute its assets;

Preserve the association or its property as a going concern for no more than a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings;

Transfer association property; and

Perform other necessary acts.

After dissolution and upon application of a limited cooperative association, a member, or a holder of financial rights, the appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of the association, including the appointment of a person to wind up the association’s activities, if:

After a reasonable time, the association has not wound up its activities; or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

If a person is appointed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to wind up the activities of a limited cooperative association, the association shall promptly deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to the articles of association to reflect the appointment.

Dissolution of a limited cooperative association shall not abate or suspend KRS

272A.5-030

or

272A.8-020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 93, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-070.
Distribution of assets in winding up.

In winding up a limited cooperative association’s business, the association shall apply its assets to discharge its obligations to creditors, including members that are creditors. The association shall apply any remaining assets to pay in money the net amount distributable to members in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection (2) of this section.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, in this section “financial interests” means the amounts recorded in the names of members in the records of a limited cooperative association at the time a distribution is made, including amounts paid to become a member, amounts allocated but not distributed to members, and amounts of distributions authorized but not yet paid to members. Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, each member is entitled to a distribution from the association of any remaining assets in the proportion of the member’s financial interests to the total financial interests of the members after all other obligations are satisfied.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 94, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-080.
Known claims against dissolved limited cooperative association.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a dissolved limited cooperative association may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

A dissolved limited cooperative association may notify its known claimants of the dissolution in a record. The notice shall:

Provide the name of the association;

Specify that a claim be in a record;

Specify the information required to be included in the claim;

Provide an address to which the claim must be sent;

State the deadline for receipt of the claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against a dissolved limited cooperative association is barred if the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met, and:

The association is not notified of the claimant’s claim, in a record, by the deadline specified in the notice under subsection (2)(e) of this section;

In the case of a claim that is timely received but rejected by the association, the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the claim against the association within ninety (90) days after receipt of the notice of the rejection; or

If a claim is timely received but is neither accepted nor rejected by the association within one hundred twenty (120) days after the deadline for receipt of claims, the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the claim against the association within ninety (90) days after the one hundred twenty (120) day period.

This section shall not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution or a liability that is contingent on that date.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 95, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-090.
Unknown claims against dissolved limited cooperative association.

A dissolved limited cooperative association may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the association to present them in accordance with the notice.

A notice under subsection (1) of this section shall:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the dissolved limited cooperative association’s principal office is located or, if the association does not have a principal office in the Commonwealth, in the county in which the association’s registered office is or was last located;

Provide the name of the association and describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide an address to which the claim is to be sent; and

State that a claim against the association is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than two (2) years after publication of the notice.

If a dissolved limited cooperative association publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim not later than three (3) years after the first publication date of the notice:

A claimant that is entitled to but did not receive notice in a record under KRS

272A.12-080

; or

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section may be enforced:

Against a dissolved limited cooperative association, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the association’s assets have been distributed in connection with winding up, against a member or holder of financial rights to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or the association’s assets distributed to the person in connection with the winding up, whichever is less. The person’s total liability for all claims under this paragraph shall not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person as part of the winding up of the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 96, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-100.
Court proceedings.

Upon application by a dissolved limited cooperative association that has published a notice under KRS

272A.12-090

, the appropriate court may determine the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims against the association that are contingent, have not been made known to the association, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the association, are reasonably anticipated to arise after the effective date of dissolution.

Not later than ten (10) days after filing an application under subsection (1) of this section, a dissolved limited cooperative association shall give notice of the proceeding to each known claimant holding a contingent claim.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem in a proceeding brought under this section to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown, including those whose claims are contingent or based upon an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution. The dissolved limited cooperative association shall pay reasonable fees and expenses of the representative, including all reasonable attorney and expert witness fees.

Provision by the dissolved limited cooperative association for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court satisfies the association’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the association, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and the claims may not be enforced against a member that received a distribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 97, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.12-110.
Articles of dissolution.

A limited cooperative association that has dissolved shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that state:

The name of the association;

The date the association dissolved; and

Any other information the association considers relevant.

A person has notice of a limited cooperative association’s dissolution on the later of:

Ninety (90) days after a statement of dissolution is filed; or

Actual notice of the articles of dissolution.

This section does not apply upon the judicial dissolution of a limited cooperative association pursuant to KRS

272A.12-030

or administrative dissolution pursuant to Subchapter 7 of KRS Chapter 14A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 98, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 13. Actions by a Member Against a Limited Cooperative Association

272A.13-010.
Derivative actions.

A member may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association if:

The member demands that the association bring an action to enforce the right; and

Any of the following occur:

The association does not, within ninety (90) days after the member makes the demand, agree to bring the action;

The association notifies the member that it has rejected the demand;

Irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting ninety (90) days after the member makes the demand; or

The association agrees to bring an action demanded and fails to bring the action within a reasonable time.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 99, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.13-020.
Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association may be maintained only by a person that:

Is a member or a dissociated member at the time the action is commenced and:

Was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Whose status as a member devolved upon the person by operation of law or the organic rules from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct; and

Adequately represents the interests of the association.

If the sole plaintiff in a derivative action dies while the action is pending, the court may permit another member who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section to be substituted as plaintiff.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 100, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.13-030.
Pleading derivative action.

In a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association, the complaint shall be verified and shall state:

The date and content of the plaintiff’s demand under KRS

272A.13-010

(1) and the association’s response;

If ninety (90) days have not expired since the demand, how irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting for the expiration of ninety (90) days; and

If the association agreed to bring an action demanded, that the action has not been brought within a reasonable time.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 101, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.13-040.
Approval of discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association may not be discontinued or settled without the court’s approval.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 102, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.13-050.
Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the association and not to the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff in the derivative action receives any proceeds, the plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the association.

On termination of the proceeding, the court may:

Require the plaintiff to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the proceeding to the extent it finds that the proceeding or any portion thereof was commenced without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; and

Require the association to pay the plaintiff’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 103, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 14. Foreign Limited Cooperative Associations

272A.14-010.
Foreign limited cooperative associations.

The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited cooperative association is organized govern relations among the members of the foreign cooperative and between the members and the foreign cooperative.

A foreign limited cooperative association shall be subject to KRS Chapter 14A.

A foreign limited cooperative association shall not be denied a certificate of authority because of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign cooperative is organized and the law of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 104, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.14-020.
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited cooperative association from transacting business in this Commonwealth in violation of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 105, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 15. Disposition of Assets

272A.15-010.
Disposition of assets not requiring member approval.

Unless the articles of association otherwise provide, member approval under KRS

272A.15-020

is not required for a limited cooperative association to:

Sell, lease, exchange, license, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the association in the usual and regular course of business; or

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, or encumber in any way all or any part of the assets of the association, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 106, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.15-020.
Member approval of other asset dispositions.

A sale, lease, exchange, license, or other disposition of assets of a limited cooperative association, other than a disposition described in KRS

272A.15-010

, requires approval of the association’s members under KRS

272A.15-030

and

272A.15-040

if the disposition leaves the association without significant continuing business activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 107, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.15-030.
Notice and action in asset disposition.

For a limited cooperative association to dispose of assets under KRS

272A.15-020

:

A majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the organic rules, shall approve the proposed disposition; and

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider the proposed disposition, hold the meeting not later than ninety (90) days after approval of the proposed disposition by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The terms of the proposed disposition;

A recommendation that the members approve the disposition, or if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board’s submission of the proposed disposition to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the proposed disposition will be considered, which shall be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 108, effective July 12, 2012.